Utah, session 2026, HB486.
Section 1. Section 57-31-101 is amended to read:57-31-101. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)(a)"Deed" means an instrument in writing, including anya conveyance that affects, purports to affect, describes, or otherwise concerns anya right, a title, or an interest in real property.(b)"Deed" does not include:(i) governing documents as defined in Section 57-8-3 or 57-8a-102; or(ii) a reinvestment fee covenant recorded in accordance with Section 57-1-46.(2)"Fraudulent deed" means a deed that is not executed or authorized to be executed by the record interest holder.(3)"Interest holder" means a person who holds or possesses athe present, lawful property interest in real property that the deed purports to convey or affect.(4)"Purported grantee" means a person who is identified as the grantee on a fraudulent deed.(5)"Purported grantor" means a person who executes or causes to be executed a fraudulent deed.(6)"Record interest holder" means a person:(a)who holds or possesses athe present, lawful property interest in real property that the deed purports to convey or affect; and(b)whose name and interest in the real property appears in the county recorder's records for the county in which the property is located.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.